apertium-fra.fra.metadix
<pardef n="l/e__prn">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lui__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- avec lui (comme: avec moi, toi, etc.) -->
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lui-même__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>lui-même</l>  <r>lui-même<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elle-même</l> <r>lui-même<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eux-mêmes</l> <r>lui-même<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elles-mêmes</l><r>lui-même<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="en__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/on__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>on<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>t-on</l>      <r>on<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="se__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="je__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tu__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="moi__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="toi__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eux__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="certain/s__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tou/t__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aucun__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="un__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="beaucoup__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="personne__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tout_le_monde__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="n'importe_qui__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ceci__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quelque_chose__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quelques_un/s__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>s<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/le_mien__prn">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>miennes</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la<b/>mienne</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>miens</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>le<b/>mien</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>les<b/>miennes</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>la<b/>mienne</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>les<b/>miens</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>le<b/>mien</l><r>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="du_mien__prn">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des<b/>miennes</l><r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>des<b/>miens</l><r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>du<b/>mien</l><r>de<s n="pr"/><j/>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="au_mien__prn">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aux<b/>miennes</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aux<b/>miens</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>au<b/>mien</l><r>à<s n="pr"/><j/>le<b/>mien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/le_sien__prn">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>siennes</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>la<b/>sienne</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>les<b/>siens</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>le<b/>sien</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>les<b/>siennes</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>la<b/>sienne</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>les<b/>siens</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>le<b/>sien</l><r>le<b/>sien<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="du mien"><i></i><par n="du_mien__prn"/></e>
<e lm="au mien"><i></i><par n="au_mien__prn"/></e>
<e lm="lui-même"><i></i><par n="/lui-même__prn"/></e>
<e lm="le mien"><i></i><par n="/le_mien__prn"/></e>
<e lm="le sien"><i></i><par n="/le_sien__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ceci"><p><l><a/>ceci</l>                 <r>ceci</r></p><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="en"><p><l><a/>en</l>                     <r>en</r></p><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="je"><p><l><a/>je</l>                     <r>je</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="je"><p><l><a/>je</l>                     <r>prpers</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="ne"><p><l><a/>ne</l>                     <r>ne</r></p><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="se"><p><l><a/>se</l>                     <r>se</r></p><par n="se__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="tu"><p><l><a/>tu</l>                     <r>tu</r></p><par n="tu__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="tu"><p><l><a/>tu</l>                     <r>prpers</r></p><par n="tu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="aucun"><i>aucun</i><par n="aucun__prn"/></e>
<e lm="autrui"><i>autrui</i><par n="personne__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ce"><i>ce</i><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ceci"><i>ceci</i><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e lm="cela"><i>cela</i><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e lm="certains"><i>certain</i><par n="certain/s__prn"/></e>
<e lm="chacun"><i>chacun</i><par n="aucun__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="chacun"><i>chacun</i><par n="personne__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="en"><i>en</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
<e lm="eux"><i>eux</i><par n="eux__prn"/></e>
<e lm="eux tous"><p><l>eux<b/>tous</l>                 <r>eux<b/>tous</r></p><par n="eux__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="je"><p><l>je</l>                         <r>je</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="on"><p><l>l'</l>                         <r></r></p><par n="/on__prn"/></e>
<e lm="lui"><p><l>lui</l>                              <r>lui</r></p><par n="lui__prn"/></e>
<e lm="moi"><p><l>moi</l>                              <r>moi</r></p><par n="moi__prn"/></e>
<e lm="moi-même"><p><l>moi-même</l>                    <r>moi-même</r></p><par n="moi__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="je"><p><l>moi<b/><a/>je</l>              <r>moi<b/>je</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="je"><p><l>moi<b/>je</l>                  <r>moi<b/>je</r></p><par n="je__prn"/></e>
<e lm="n'importe qui"><i>n'importe<b/>qui</i><par n="n'importe_qui__prn"/></e>
<e lm="n'importe quoi"><i>n'importe<b/>quoi</i><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e lm="nous on"><i>nous<b/></i><par n="/on__prn"/></e>
<e lm="on"><i></i><par n="/on__prn"/></e>
<e lm="pas tout"><i>pas<b/>tou</i><par n="tou/t__prn"/></e>
<e lm="personne"><i>personne</i><par n="personne__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quiconque"><i>quiconque</i><par n="personne__prn"/></e>
<e lm="beaucoup"><i>beaucoup</i><par n="beaucoup__prn"/></e>
<e lm="peu"><i>peu</i><par n="beaucoup__prn"/></e>
<e lm="plus rien"><i>plus<b/>rien</i><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quelqu'un"><i>quelqu'un</i><par n="personne__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quelqu'un"><i>quelqu'un</i><par n="un__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quelque chose"><i>quelque<b/>chose</i><par n="quelque_chose__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quelques un/s"><i>quelques<b/>un</i><par n="quelques_un/s__prn"/></e>
<e lm="rien de plus"><i>rien<b/>de<b/>plus</i><par n="ceci__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se__prn"/></e>
<e lm="toi"><p><l>toi</l>                              <r>toi</r></p><par n="toi__prn"/></e>
<e lm="toi-même"><p><l>toi-même</l>                    <r>toi-même</r></p><par n="toi__prn"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="toi tu"><p><l>toi<b/><a/>tu</l>          <r>toi<b/>tu</r></p><par n="tu__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="toi tu"><p><l>toi<b/>tu</l>              <r>toi<b/>tu</r></p><par n="tu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tout"><i>tou</i><par n="tou/t__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tout le monde"><i>tout<b/>le<b/>monde</i><par n="tout_le_monde__prn"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="tu"><p><l>tu</l>                         <r>tu</r></p><par n="tu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="un__prn"/></e>
<e lm="y"><i>y</i><par n="en__prn"/></e>
